Nevada, session 83, AB145.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 417 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2, a person
shall not prepare, present, prosecute, advise, consult or assist any
other person with a claim before the United States Department of
Veterans Affairs, the United States Department of Defense or the
Department in violation of 38 U.S.C. § 5901 or 38 C.F.R. § 14.629
-
*AB145_R1*

– 3 –
unless the person has been recognized or accredited by the United
States Department of Veterans Affairs to perform such activities.
2. The provisions of this section:
(a) Shall not be construed to prohibit a person from preparing,
presenting, prosecuting, advising, consulting or assisting any
other person with a claim, provided that the person does not
request or accept any payment or donation for such services; and
(b) Do not apply to the extent preempted by federal law.
Sec. 2. NRS 417.137 is hereby amended to read as follows:
417.137 1. The Attorney General may recover a civil penalty
of not more than $10,000 for each violation of NRS 417.133 or
417.135 [.] or section 1 of this act. The Attorney General shall
deposit any civil penalty recovered pursuant to this section in the
Gift Account for Veterans created by NRS 417.115.
2. A person aggrieved by a violation of NRS 417.133 or
417.135 or section 1 of this act may bring an action for consumer
fraud pursuant to NRS 41.600.
Sec. 3. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 4. Chapter 418 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 5 to 9, inclusive, of this
act.
Sec. 5. As used in NRS 418.030 and 418.045 and sections 5
to 9, inclusive, of this act, unless the context otherwise requires,
the words and terms defined in sections 6 and 7 of this act, have
the meanings ascribed to them in those sections.
Sec. 6. “Servicemember” means a person who is an active
member of the:
1. Armed Forces of the United States;
2. National Guard or a reserve component of the Armed
Forces of the United States; or
3. Commissioned Corps of the United States Public Health
Service or the Commissioned Corps of the National Oceanic and
Atmospheric Administration of the United States and is serving in
the capacity of a commissioned officer in defense of the United
States.
Sec. 7. “Veterans Coordinator” means the Veterans
Coordinator in the Division of Human Resource Management of
the Department of Administration employed by the Administrator
of the Division pursuant to section 11 of this act.
Sec. 8. 1. Under the supervision of the Veterans
Coordinator, the Division of Human Resource Management of the
Department of Administration shall establish a veteran hiring
program to support the recruitment and retention of employees
who are veterans or the spouses of veterans or servicemembers.
2. The program must:
-
*AB145_R1*

– 4 –
(a) Identify positions in the service of the State that align with
the education, skills and experience of a qualifying person;
(b) Advise and assist a qualifying person with the completion
of profiles and job applications; and
(c) Provide guidance to a qualifying person throughout the
application and hiring process.
3. On or before November 30 of each year, the Veterans
Coordinator shall submit to the Interagency Council on Veterans
Affairs a report concerning the progress of the program.
4. As used in this section, “qualifying person” means a
person who is a veteran or the spouse of a veteran or
servicemember.
Sec. 9. 1. Under the supervision of the Veterans
Coordinator, the Division of Human Resource Management of the
Department of Administration shall establish a peer mentor
program to support mentoring, professional development and
networking opportunities for veterans who are employed by the
State.
2. The peer mentor program must:
(a) Improve the recruitment of veterans through outreach and
raising awareness of career opportunities with state agencies;
(b) Improve the retention of veterans by providing support,
mentorship and professional development opportunities;
(c) Improve employee morale through veteran recognition
events and activities; and
(d) Include quarterly meetings which are open to all employees
of the State, to provide information related to veteran resources,
veteran services or any other information the Veterans
Coordinator or the Division of Human Resource Management
deems necessary.
3. The Division of Human Resource Management shall
coordinate with the Interagency Council on Veterans Affairs to
encourage employers in this State to establish peer mentor
programs for veterans within their organizations.
4. Each state agency that employs a veteran shall coordinate
with the Veterans Coordinator to identify at least one employee to
serve as a peer mentor for veterans and participate in the peer
mentor program. A peer mentor is not required to have prior
military service or entitled to receive additional compensation for
serving as a peer mentor.
5. On or before November 30 of each year, the Veterans
Coordinator shall submit to the Interagency Council on Veterans
Affairs a report concerning the progress of the program.
-
*AB145_R1*

– 5 –
Sec. 10. NRS 41.600 is hereby amended to read as follows:
41.600 1. An action may be brought by any person who is a
victim of consumer fraud.
2. As used in this section, “consumer fraud” means:
(a) An unlawful act as defined in NRS 119.330;
(b) An unlawful act as defined in NRS 205.2747;
(c) An act prohibited by NRS 482.36655 to 482.36667,
inclusive;
(d) An act prohibited by NRS 482.351;
(e) A deceptive trade practice as defined in NRS 598.0915 to
598.0925, inclusive; or
(f) A violation of NRS 417.133 or 417.135 [.] or section 1 of
this act.
3. If the claimant is the prevailing party, the court shall award
the claimant:
(a) Any damages that the claimant has sustained;
(b) Any equitable relief that the court deems appropriate; and
(c) The claimant’s costs in the action and reasonable attorney’s
fees.
4. Any action brought pursuant to this section is not an action
upon any contract underlying the original transaction.
Sec. 11. Chapter 284 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. The Administrator of the Division shall employ a Veterans
Coordinator who is in the classified service of the State.
2. The Veterans Coordinator employed pursuant to
subsection 1 shall supervise:
(a) The veteran hiring program established pursuant to section
8 of this act;
(b) The peer mentor program established pursuant to section 9
of this act; and
(c) Any other programs or initiatives of the Division that
support the recruitment and retention of employees who are
veterans or the spouses of veterans or servicemembers.
3. As used in this section, “servicemember” has the meaning
ascribed to it in section 6 of this act.
Sec. 12. NRS 407.0655 is hereby amended to read as follows:
407.0655 The Administrator shall establish a program for the
issuance of an annual permit, free of charge, to enter each state park
and recreation area in this State to:
1. Any member of an Indian tribe that is located in whole or in
part in this State; [and]
2. Any bona fide resident of this State who has been discharged
from the Armed Forces of the United States, except a person who
has been dishonorably discharged [.] ; and
-
*AB145_R1*

– 6 –
3. Any bona fide resident of this State who is the widow,
widower, parent or adult child of a person killed in the line of duty
while on active duty in the Armed Forces of the United States.
Sec. 13. Any person who, on October 1, 2025, is employed by
the Division of Human Resources Management in the Department
of Administration as the Veterans Coordinator and is otherwise
qualified to serve as the Veterans Coordinator may continue to serve
in that capacity and may only be transferred, promoted, demoted or
discharged in accordance with the provisions of chapter 284 of the
Nevada Revised Statutes.
H
-
*AB145_R1*